incubator/apertium-lat/apertium-lat.lat.dix
    <pardef n="am/are__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abo</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abimus</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abis</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abitis</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abit</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abunt</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abor</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="psv"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abimur</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="psv"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aberis</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="psv"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abimini</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="psv"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abitur</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="psv"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abuntur</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="psv"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>avero</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>averimus</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>averis</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>averitis</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>averit</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>averint</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>avi</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>avimus</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>avisti</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>avistis</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>avit</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>averunt</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>averam</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pmp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>averamus</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pmp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>averas</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pmp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>averatis</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pmp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>averat</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pmp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>averant</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pmp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abam</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abamus</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abas</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abatis</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abat</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abant</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abar</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="psv"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abamur</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="psv"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abaris</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="psv"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abamini</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="psv"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abatur</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="psv"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abantur</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="psv"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>amus</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atis</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>at</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ant</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>or</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="psv"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>amur</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="psv"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aris</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="psv"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>amini</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="psv"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atur</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="psv"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>antur</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="psv"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atur</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pfut"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__amatus"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>and</l>
          <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pfut"/><s n="psv"/></r>
        </p>

    <e lm="amare"><i>am</i><par n="am/are__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="portare"><i>port</i><par n="am/are__vblex"/></e>
